Tennessee, session 114, SB2533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as "The Isbill Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 8, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The Tennessee peace officer standards and training (POST) commission
shall adopt guidelines and materials instructing law enforcement officers on the criteria
for emergency and nonemergency involuntary admissions to inpatient treatment, as
described in title 33, chapter 6, parts 4 and 5.
(b) Each law enforcement officer shall undergo annual training on the adopted
guidelines and materials as described in subsection (a).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, Chapter 7, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The board shall adopt guidelines and materials instructing correctional
personnel on the criteria for emergency and nonemergency involuntary admissions to
inpatient treatment, as described in title 33, chapter 6, parts 4 and 5.
(b) Each correctional personnel shall undergo annual training on the adopted
guidelines and materials as described in subsection (a).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2533
010428
- 1 -